Nebraska, session 109, LB217.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. For purposes of providing training for individuals involved in
the child welfare system, the Department of Health and Human Services shall
develop a baseline of curriculum and training materials related to suicide
awareness and prevention in consultation with statewide and national
organizations and professionals with expertise in behavioral and mental health
and suicide prevention, including, but not limited to, the Nebraska State
Suicide Prevention Coalition and the Behavioral Health Education Center of
Nebraska. All such suicide awareness and prevention training shall incorporate
evidence-based practices and may include, but not be limited to, (1)
identification of early warning signs and symptoms of behavioral and mental
health issues for youth in the child welfare system and (2) appropriate and
effective responses for behavioral and mental health issues and trauma-informed
care.
Sec. 2. All staff involved in the child welfare system of the Department
of Health and Human Services that provide direct services to children or
families or interact directly with children or families, and any other
appropriate personnel as determined by the Division of Children and Family
Services of the Department of Health and Human Services, shall have annual
training in suicide awareness and prevention. Such training shall include
current best practices of behavioral and mental health training with a focus on
suicide awareness and prevention prior to any independent contact with youth
and families. Such training shall be provided within the framework of existing
training programs offered by the department.
Sec. 3. Section 71-1904, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-1904 (1) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations pursuant to sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01 for (a) the proper care
and protection of children by licensees under such sections, (b) the issuance,
suspension, and revocation of licenses to provide foster care, (c) the
issuance, suspension, and revocation of probationary licenses to provide foster
care, (d) the issuance, suspension, and revocation of provisional licenses to
provide foster care, (e) the provision of training in foster care, which
training shall be directly related to the skills necessary to care for children
in need of out-of-home care, including, but not limited to, abused, neglected,
dependent, and delinquent children, and (f) the proper administration of
sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01.
(2) The department may issue a waiver for any licensing standard not
related to children's safety for a relative home that is pursuing licensure.
Such waivers shall be granted on a case-by-case basis upon assessment by the
department based upon the best interests of the child. A relative home that
receives a waiver pursuant to this subsection shall be considered fully
licensed for purposes of federal reimbursement under the federal Fostering
Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008, Public Law
110-351.
(3) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
establishing new foster home licensing requirements that ensure children's
safety, health, and well-being but minimize the use of licensing mandates for
nonsafety issues. Such rules and regulations shall provide alternatives to
address nonsafety issues regarding housing and provide assistance to families
in overcoming licensing barriers, especially in child-specific relative and
kinship placements, to maximize appropriate reimbursement under Title IV-E of
the federal Social Security Act, as amended, including expanding the use of
kinship guardianship assistance payments under 42 U.S.C. 673(d), as such act
and section existed on January 1, 2013.
(4) The department shall include suicide awareness and prevention training
meeting the requirements of section 1 of this act for initial licensure and
renewal of licensure pursuant to sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01.
Sec. 4. Section 71-1924, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-1924 Sections 71-1924 to 71-1951 and section 5 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing
Licensure Act.
Sec. 5. The department shall establish standardized suicide awareness and
-1-

LB217 LB217
2025 2025
prevention training requirements for all employees of a child-placing agency
prior to any independent contact with youth and families. Such training shall
incorporate a baseline of curriculum materials described in section 1 of this
act while also allowing a child-placing agency to incorporate training elements
that meet the specific needs of the individual agency. The department may
approve the existing curriculum of a child-placing agency if such curriculum
meets the baseline of curriculum pursuant to section 1 of this act.
Sec. 6. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
Sec. 7. Original section 71-1904, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and section 71-1924, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-2-